Hawaii, session 2025, HB1326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $30,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the fourteenth representative district, as follows: 1.   Ma'alaea Small Boat Harbor Dredging Design and construction, including permitting, to dredge harbor basin and entrance channel. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $5,500,000 Total funding                     $6,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 2.   Lahaian Small Boat Harbor water system and pavement Design and construction, including permitting, to repair and restore harbor water system and resurface asphalt pavement at front row and innner marginal wharf. Design                         $400,000 Construction                 $3,600,000 Total funding                     $4,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 3.   Lahaina Bypass extension north Construction for extension of Lahaina Bypass north from Keawe Street Construction                $20,000,000 Total funding                    $20,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________